Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 285B.551 is amended to read:
285B.551. (1) Pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585, at the request  of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, after  the department consults with the Oregon Business Development
Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds:
(a) To provide financial and other assistance, including but not limited to loans and grants,  to
municipalities, ports and other persons and entities in accordance with the laws governing use  of
moneys in the Special Public Works Fund created  by ORS 285B.455, the Water Fund created by ORS
285B.563, the Safe Drinking Water Revolving  Loan Fund created by ORS 285A.213, the Oregon Port
Revolving Fund created by ORS 285A.708, the Brownfields Redevelopment Fund created by ORS
285A.188, the Oregon Business Development Fund created by ORS 285B.092 and  the Marine Navi-
gation Improvement Fund created by ORS 777.267.
(b) To fund Oregon’s share of the costs of the Columbia River channel deepening project.
(c) To fund Oregon’s share  of the costs of studies and ecosystem restoration projects in the
lower Columbia River estuary designed to  improve habitat for listed endangered or threatened spe-
cies of Columbia River anadromous salmonids.
(2) The use of lottery bond proceeds is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) The financial and other assistance to municipalities, ports and other  persons and entities
will assist in the establishment and expansion of businesses in  Oregon and in the construction, im-
provement and expansion of infrastructure, community and port  facilities and other facilities that
comprise  the  physical foundation for industrial and commercial activity and provide the basic
framework for continued and expanded economic opportunities and quality  communities throughout
Oregon.
(b) The Columbia River channel deepening project is  necessary to allow newer, larger
steamships access to Oregon and Washington deep draft ports. A deeper shipping channel will  allow
the Columbia River to  continue as a world leader in agricultural exports and as a key trade corridor
for farms and businesses throughout Oregon and the region.
(c) Such financial and other assistance to municipalities, ports and other persons  and entities
and the deepening of the Columbia River channel will therefore promote  economic development
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 1
within this state, and  thus the use of net proceeds derived from the operation of the Oregon State
Lottery to pay debt service on lottery bonds  issued under this section to provide such financial and
other assistance to municipalities, ports and other  persons and entities and to pay a portion of the
costs of deepening the Columbia  River channel is an authorized use of state lottery funds under
section 4, Article XV of the Oregon Constitution, and ORS 461.510.
(d) The current lower Columbia River estuary habitat for listed endangered or  threatened spe-
cies  of  Columbia River anadromous salmonids could be improved through ecosystem restoration
projects. The use of the Oregon State Lottery to pay debt service on lottery bonds issued  under this
section to pay  for studying how the estuary could be improved and to pay for ecosystem restoration
projects are authorized uses of state lottery funds.
(3)(a) The aggregate  principal amount of lottery bonds issued pursuant to subsection (1)(a) of
this section for financial and other assistance to municipalities, ports and other  persons and entities
may not  exceed the sum of [ $386,226,252] $416,226,252 and an additional amount estimated by the
State Treasurer to be  necessary to pay bond-related costs. The aggregate principal amount of lottery
bonds issued pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section for the Columbia River channel  deepening
project may not  exceed the sum of $17.7 million and an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(b) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may not request the  issuance of lottery
bonds under subsection (1)(b) of this section  until the Director of the Oregon Business Development
Department determines  that a final environmental impact statement has been issued and a record
of decisions  has been submitted to Congress by the United States Army Corps of Engineers, Con-
gress has authorized the Columbia River channel deepening project, and  the Washington sponsors’
shares of the costs of the Columbia River channel deepening project have been committed.
(4) The net proceeds of lottery bonds issued pursuant to subsection (1)(a)  and (b) of this section
shall be deposited in the Economic Infrastructure Project Fund, which is  hereby established in the
State Treasury separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by the  Economic
Infrastructure Project Fund shall be credited  to the fund. All moneys in the Economic Infrastructure
Project  Fund  are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Development Department for
any purpose for which  moneys in the Special Public Works Fund created by ORS 285B.455 may be
used, any  purpose for which moneys in the Water Fund created by ORS 285B.563 may be used, any
purpose for which moneys in the Safe Drinking Water Revolving Loan Fund  created by ORS
285A.213 may be used, any purpose for which moneys in  the Oregon Port Revolving Fund created
by ORS 285A.708 may be used, any purpose for which moneys in the Brownfields Redevelopment
Fund created by ORS 285A.188 may be used, any purpose for  which moneys in the Oregon Business
Development Fund created by ORS 285B.092 may be used and any purpose for  which moneys in the
Marine Navigation  Improvement Fund created by ORS 777.267 may be used. The Director of the
Oregon Business Development Department shall allocate the moneys deposited in  the Economic
Infrastructure  Project  Fund for the purposes described in this subsection in accordance with the
priorities developed by the Oregon Business Development Commission in accordance with  ORS
285A.020. However, the director shall  transfer from the Economic Infrastructure Project Fund and
deposit into the Channel  Deepening Account of the Marine Navigation Improvement Fund the pro-
ceeds of any lottery bonds sold to finance  a portion of the costs of the Columbia River channel
deepening project. Upon determining the relative  allocation of moneys deposited in the Economic
Infrastructure Project Fund among  the purposes described in this subsection, the director shall
transfer from the Economic Infrastructure Project Fund, and deposit into each  of the other funds
described in this subsection, the amounts so allocated. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law
governing the funds described in this  subsection, the funds described in this subsection may be
credited with moneys transferred from the Economic Infrastructure Project Fund by the director  in
accordance with this subsection.
(5) The aggregate principal amount of lottery bonds issued  pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this
section for the costs of studies and ecosystem restoration projects in  the lower Columbia River
estuary may not exceed the sum of $750,000 and an additional amount estimated by the  State
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 2
Treasurer  to  be necessary to pay bond-related costs. The net proceeds of lottery bonds issued pur-
suant to subsection (1)(c) of this section shall be  deposited in the Oregon Business, Innovation and
Trade Fund created by ORS 285A.227 and may be  used only for the Oregon nonfederal share of
United States Army Corps of Engineers Columbia  River estuary projects authorized by Congress
prior to August 9, 2001. The director may  not request the issuance of lottery bonds under subsection
(1)(c) of  this section until Congress and Washington have authorized their respective shares of the
costs of the studies and ecosystem restoration projects in the lower Columbia River estuary.
(6) The proceeds of lottery bonds issued  pursuant to this section may be used only for the pur-
poses set forth in this section and for bond-related costs.
SECTION 2. (1) For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  State De-
partment of Fish and Wildlife, the State Treasurer is  authorized to issue lottery bonds pur-
suant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in  an amount that produces $5 million in net proceeds for
the purposes described in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated
by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
State Department of Fish  and Wildlife for deposit in the Oregon Conservation and Recreation
Fund established in ORS 496.252, for wildlife passage infrastructure to support wildlife  mo-
bility and habitat connectivity within priority corridors.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
this authorization will be used to protect native fish and wildlife.
SECTION 3. (1) For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  State De-
partment of Fish and Wildlife, the State Treasurer is  authorized to issue lottery bonds pur-
suant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an  amount that produces $8.75 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
State Department of Fish and Wildlife for deposit  in the Fish Passage Fund established in
ORS 497.139, for fish passage infrastructure.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
this authorization will be used to protect native fish.
SECTION 4. (1) For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $10 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for  deposit in the Levee Project Grant Fund es-
tablished in ORS 285B.421, for the purpose of providing grants under  ORS 285B.420 for levee
projects as defined in ORS 285B.410.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Levees are an integral part of the commercial and  industrial infrastructure of this
state; and
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 3
(b) The inspection, accreditation, certification and repair of levees  will promote economic
development within this state.
SECTION 5. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at the  request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Watershed Enhancement Board, the State Treasurer is authorized to  issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $4 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Oregon Watershed Enhancement Board for deposit in  the Community Drinking Water En-
hancement and Protection Fund established in section 4, chapter ___,  Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled House Bill 2010), to provide  grants to water suppliers to protect, restore or en-
hance sources of drinking water.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
having adequate drinking water systems enhances  community development and supports
Oregon’s economic growth.
SECTION 6. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at the  request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $50 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for deposit in the Child Care Infrastructure Fund
established in section 3, chapter ____, Oregon Laws 2023 (Enrolled House Bill 3005).
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife,  and is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Increasing the capacity of child care facilities will create jobs; and
(b) Providing additional opportunities for child care  will allow more individuals needing
child care to seek employment, promoting economic growth.
NOTE:
 Section 7 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
SECTION 8. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at the  request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults  with the Department
of Education, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds  pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to  286A.585 in an amount that produces $15 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by  the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Department of Education for deposit in the Connecting Oregon Schools Fund  established in
ORS 276A.424, for providing matching funds for federal moneys received  by school districts,
education service  districts, public charter schools or a consortium that consists of any
combination of school districts, education service districts and public charter schools, for the
purpose of providing broadband access to eligible education facilities in this state.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 4
(a) Assisting education facilities  with matching funds promotes expansion of access to
high-speed broadband for public education; and
(b) Providing financial assistance  to education facilities for building connections to
broadband infrastructure will enhance community efforts to promote economic growth.
SECTION 9.  Section 4, chapter  906, Oregon Laws 2009, as amended by section 3, chapter 624,
Oregon Laws 2011, section 19, chapter 786,  Oregon Laws 2013, section 15, chapter 121, Oregon Laws
2014, section 37, chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015, section 4, chapter 66, Oregon Laws 2016, section
7, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, section 7,  chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, and section 4, chapter
682, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 4.  (1) Pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to  286A.585, at the request of the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services, after the department consults  with the Housing and Community Services
Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds for the Housing and Community
Services Department to provide financial assistance to aid in the acquisition, renovation or mainte-
nance of properties with  project-based federal rental assistance contracts, public housing undergoing
significant recapitalization or publicly supported housing  as defined in ORS 456.250, or to preserve
the affordability of manufactured dwelling parks.
(2) The use of lottery bond proceeds is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) Individuals who are at risk of homelessness or who otherwise pay a disproportionate  share
of income for housing increase their potential  for self-sufficiency, and use proportionately fewer
community-funded resources when they are provided a stable housing environment.
(b) Having housing for at-risk populations is essential to Oregon’s healthy economic growth.
(3) The aggregate  principal amount of lottery bonds issued pursuant to subsection (1) of this
section may not exceed the  amount of [ $58,801,718] $108,801,718 plus an additional amount estimated
by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs as defined in ORS 286A.560.
SECTION 10.
(1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the  department consults with the Water Re-
sources Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant  to
ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $50 million in  net proceeds for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Water Resources Department for deposit in the  Water Supply Development Account estab-
lished in ORS 541.656, to issue grants for irrigation modernization projects that:
(a) Leverage federal  funding associated with Natural Resources Conservation Service
authorized watershed plans, U.S. Bureau of Reclamation WaterSMART  grant recipients or
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency grant recipients that are eligible to  be on the De-
partment of Environmental Quality’s Intended Use Plan; and
(b) Provide public benefits in each category of benefits described in ORS 541.673.
(3) For projects involving surface  water rights where the project conserves water, pri-
ority shall be given to projects that  legally protect a portion of the conserved water instream
commensurate with the amount required under the approach described in ORS 537.470.
(4) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Having adequate and  efficient irrigation systems enhances community development
and supports Oregon’s economic growth; and
(b) Assisting local governments to mitigate losses resulting  from reduced water supply
for irrigation will enhance community efforts to facilitate and promote economic growth.
SECTION 11.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department  consults with the Water Re-
sources Department,  the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 5
ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in  an amount that produces $10 million in net proceeds for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional  amount estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Water Resources Department for deposit in the  Water Supply Development Account estab-
lished in ORS  541.656, for providing grants or loans to evaluate, plan and develop in-stream
and out-of-stream statewide water development projects.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife,  and is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Having adequate drinking water systems, irrigation, drainage and healthy ecosystems
enhances community development and supports Oregon’s economic growth; and
(b) Assisting local governments to mitigate losses resulting  from reduced water supply
for irrigation and retirement of water  rights will enhance community efforts to facilitate and
promote economic growth.
SECTION 12. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults  with the State Parks
and Recreation Department, the State Treasurer may issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to  286A.585 in an amount that produces $10 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by  the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
State Parks and  Recreation Department for deposit into the Oregon Main Street
Revitalization Grant Program Fund established in ORS  390.264, to provide grants pursuant
to ORS 390.262.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of proceeds of lottery bonds issued  pur-
suant to this section will create jobs, further  economic development and enhance the eco-
nomic vitality of Oregon downtowns  and local communities by supporting projects that
revitalize historic downtown commercial districts,  redevelop and reuse existing buildings,
facilitate small business relocation and expansion initiatives and  provide assistance, training
and technical services.
SECTION 13. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Health Authority, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue  lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to  286A.585 in an amount that produces $50 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Oregon Health Authority for deposit in the Community  Acute Psychiatric Facility Capacity
Program Fund established in section 14 of this 2023 Act.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife,  and is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Increasing the capacity of acute psychiatric facilities will create jobs; and
(b) Providing additional opportunities for treatment will allow for economic growth  in
local communities.
SECTION 14.
(1) The Community Acute Psychiatric Facility Capacity Program Fund  is
established in the State Treasury, separate  and distinct from the General Fund. Interest
earned by the Community Acute Psychiatric Facility Capacity Program Fund must  be cred-
ited to the  fund. The Community Acute Psychiatric Facility Capacity Program Fund consists
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 6
of moneys deposited in the fund under section 13 of this 2023 Act, moneys appropriated, al-
located, deposited, or  transferred to the fund by the Legislative Assembly or otherwise and
interest earned on moneys in the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Oregon Health Authority for
the purpose of providing grants to increase community acute psychiatric facility capacity.
SECTION 15.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Willamette
Falls Locks Authority, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue  lottery bonds pursuant to
ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $7.25 million in net proceeds for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional  amount estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to the Willamette Falls Locks Authority for  restoration
of the Willamette Falls navigation canal and locks.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
restoration of the Willamette Falls navigation canal and locks will enhance the  economic
viability of the region, increase opportunities for commercial transportation and  offer op-
portunities for recreation and transportation.
SECTION 16.
(1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the City of
Redmond, the  State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $3 million in net proceeds for the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to the City of Redmond for construction of a public safety
facility.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
public safety facilities are necessary components of a climate that facilitates and encourages
economic development.
SECTION 17.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department  consults with the Serendipity
Center, the  State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $2.8 million in net proceeds for the purposes de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional  amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to the Serendipity Center for construction  of an addition
on the school campus that will include classrooms and  spaces for physical movement and
counseling.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
expanding therapeutic education programs and services for at-risk youth will facilitate and
encourage economic development.
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 7
SECTION 18. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with Lane County, the
State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant  to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585
in an amount that produces $5 million in net  proceeds for the purposes described in sub-
section (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by  the State Treasurer to be
necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS  461.553, for distribution to Lane County for construction of a behavioral health
facility offering person-centered, trauma-informed services.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
behavioral health facilities are necessary components of  a climate that facilitates and en-
courages economic development.
SECTION 19. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with Homes for  Good
housing agency, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue  lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $4.9 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by  the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to Homes for Good housing  agency for construction of
an affordable housing and early learning center project in Eugene.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife,  and is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Having housing and child care for  at-risk populations is essential to Oregon’s healthy
economic growth; and
(b) A severe shortage  of affordable housing and child care facilities exists in Oregon, and
market indicators demonstrate a growing gap between the supply of  and the demand for af-
fordable housing and child care.
SECTION 20. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with the City of
Oregon City, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue  lottery bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $4 million in net proceeds for  the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for  distribution to the City of Oregon City for Phase II of the city’s Main
Street Connective Corridor Project between 10th Street and 15th Street, which includes new
curbs, sidewalks, lighting, pedestrian crossings, trees, bicycle  infrastructure, bollards, park-
ing meters and public art.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
improving multimodal transportation  networks supports the long-term economic develop-
ment and livability of this state.
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 8
SECTION 21. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $5 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for deposit in the OBDD  Economic Development
Distributions Fund established under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, for distrib-
ution to the City of Aumsville to build a mechanical  processing wastewater treatment plant.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
wastewater treatment systems  are an integral part of the commercial and industrial
infrastructure of this state, and improving wastewater treatment  will promote economic
development and watershed health.
SECTION 22. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $5 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for deposit in the OBDD  Economic Development
Distributions Fund established under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, for distrib-
ution to the City of Molalla to build a sequence batch reactor wastewater treatment plant.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
wastewater treatment systems  are an integral part of the commercial and industrial
infrastructure of this state, and improving wastewater treatment  will promote economic
development and watershed health.
SECTION 23. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $3.825 million in net pro-
ceeds for the purposes described in subsection (2) of this  section, plus an additional amount
estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Oregon Business Development  Department for deposit in the OBDD Economic Development
Distributions Fund established under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017,  for distrib-
ution to the City of Newport to make improvements to its wastewater treatment plant.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
wastewater treatment systems are an integral part of the commercial  and industrial
infrastructure of this state,  and improving wastewater treatment will promote economic
development and watershed health.
SECTION 24. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department  consults with Latino Network,
the State Treasurer is authorized to issue  lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount  that produces $4 million in net proceeds for the purposes described
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 9
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution  to Latino Network for construction of La Plaza
Esperanza in east Multnomah County.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
improving access to preschool  programs and community services will enhance the economic
viability of the region, create jobs and improve the quality of life for the community.
SECTION 25. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the  department consults with the Family Jus-
tice Center of Washington County, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $4 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to the Family  Justice Center of Washington County for
acquisition and renovation of a building to establish the Washington County  Family Peace
Center.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
programs that support children and families impacted by  child abuse, neglect and domestic
violence reduce the financial and economic burden domestic violence and  child abuse impose
on individuals and the community.
SECTION 26.
(1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the  department consults with the Water Re-
sources Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant  to
ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $5 million in net  proceeds for the
purposes described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by
the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Water Resources Department for deposit in the Water Resources  Department Water Supply
Fund established in section 10, chapter 906, Oregon  Laws 2009, for distribution to the City
of West Linn to replace the  city’s sole drinking water pipe over the Willamette River in
conjunction with the I-205 Abernathy Bridge project.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
drinking water supply lines are an integral part of the commercial  and industrial
infrastructure of this state, and essential for economic development.
SECTION 27. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the  department consults with Washington
County, the State Treasurer is authorized  to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $5 million in net proceeds for the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 10
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to Washington County for construction of a  substance
use disorder treatment facility.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
individuals increase their potential for self-sufficiency, increase  economic productivity and
use fewer public resources when they have access to addiction treatment programs  and
services.
SECTION 28. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Port of
Portland, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant  to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $5 million in net proceeds for the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to  the Port of Portland for seismic strengthening of the
soil under Marine Terminal 2 to accommodate construction of the Building Innovation Hub.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) The Building Innovation Hub will help to satisfy Oregon’s  need for affordable housing;
(b) Having housing for at-risk populations  is essential to Oregon’s healthy economic
growth; and
(c) A severe shortage of affordable housing exists  in Oregon, and market indicators
demonstrate a growing gap between the supply of and the demand for affordable housing.
SECTION 29. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with Benton County,
the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount that produces $5 million in net proceeds for  the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553,  for distribution to Benton County for construction of an emergency op-
erations center.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
emergency response facilities are necessary to protect public infrastructure and  maintain a
climate that facilitates and encourages economic development.
SECTION 30. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the City of
Redmond, the  State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $5 million in net proceeds for the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to the City of Redmond for infrastructure  improvements
to support construction of the Northpoint affordable housing project in Redmond.
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 11
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife,  and is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) Having housing for at-risk populations  is essential to Oregon’s healthy economic
growth; and
(b) A severe shortage of affordable housing facilities exists in Oregon,  and market indi-
cators demonstrate a growing gap between the supply of and the demand  for affordable
housing.
SECTION 31. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services,  after the department consults with the Department
of Transportation, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $5 million in net proceeds for  the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Department of Transportation for deposit in the DOT  Economic Development Distributions
Fund established under ORS 461.557, for distribution to the City  of Bend for construction of
a pedestrian and bicycle  overcrossing of U.S. Highway 97 and Burlington Northern Santa Fe
Railway railroad tracks along Hawthorne Avenue.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
a safe, efficient and reliable  pedestrian and bicycle transportation network supports the
long-term economic development and livability of this state.
SECTION 32. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the City of
Eugene, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds  pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $5 million in net proceeds for the purposes described
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to the City  of Eugene for construction of stadium facili-
ties at the Eugene Civic Park.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
constructing the stadium will enhance the economic viability  of the region through increased
tourism, job creation and improved quality of life for the community.
SECTION 33. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults  with the Department
of Transportation, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to  286A.585 in an amount that produces $20 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Department of Transportation for deposit in the DOT  Economic Development Distributions
Fund established under ORS 461.557,  for distribution to the Port of Hood River to support
the Hood River-White Salmon Interstate Bridge replacement project.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 12
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
a safe, efficient and reliable transportation infrastructure supports the  long-term economic
development and livability of this state.
SECTION 34. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults  with the Department
of Transportation, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds pursuant to ORS
286A.560 to  286A.585 in an amount that produces $20 million in net proceeds for the purposes
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by the State
Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Department of Transportation for deposit in the DOT  Economic Development Distributions
Fund established under ORS 461.557, for distribution to Multnomah County to support the
Earthquake Ready Burnside Bridge project in downtown Portland.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
a safe, efficient and reliable transportation infrastructure supports the  long-term economic
development and livability of this state.
SECTION 35.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560  to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $4.5 million in net pro-
ceeds for the purposes described in  subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional amount
estimated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for deposit in the OBDD  Economic Development
Distributions Fund established under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, for distrib-
ution to the City of Phoenix for infrastructure and utility improvements at a 72-acre zoned
industrial site north of Phoenix.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
utility infrastructure supports the long-term economic development of this state.
SECTION 36.
(1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces  $5 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Oregon Business Development  Department for deposit in the OBDD Economic Development
Distributions Fund established under section 28, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017,  for distrib-
ution to the Umatilla Electric Cooperative Association for infrastructure and utility  im-
provements on newly dedicated industrial land in Morrow and Umatilla Counties.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
utility infrastructure supports the long-term economic development of this state.
SECTION 37. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with Jefferson
County, the State Treasurer is authorized  to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560
to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $4 million in net proceeds for the purposes described
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 13
in subsection (2) of this section,  plus an additional amount estimated by the State Treasurer
to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
department for deposit in the ODAS  Economic Development Distributions Fund established
under ORS 461.553, for distribution to Jefferson County for an expansion to Central  Oregon
Community College’s Madras Campus  to focus on the training of early childhood educators
and healthcare workers.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
improving access to education for Oregonians entering the workforce will facilitate  and en-
courage economic development.
SECTION 38. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that produces $3,000,000 in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for deposit in the Cultural Resources Economic
Fund established in section 6, chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013, to provide a grant  to the Na-
tive Arts and Cultures Foundation to support the renovation and reopening of the  new Cen-
ter for Native Arts and Cultures in southeast Portland.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and  is authorized based on the following
findings:
(a) The grant  described in this section will leverage art and cultural resources to create
vibrant public spaces that integrate art and cultural and natural amenities, sustain  Oregon’s
rich arts and cultural experiences and enhance  a strong sense of place and community
identity; and
(b) The factors described  in paragraph (a) of this subsection have the effect of creating
jobs, expanding business and tax  revenues and enhancing the economic vitality of Oregon
communities.
SECTION 39.
 Section 28, chapter  748, Oregon Laws 2017, as amended by section 32, chapter
671, Oregon Laws 2019, section 13, chapter 5, Oregon Laws 2020 (second special session), and  sec-
tion 53, chapter 682, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 28.  (1) The OBDD Economic Development Distributions  Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned on the moneys in the OBDD
Economic Development Distributions Fund must be credited to the fund. The OBDD Economic  De-
velopment Distributions Fund consists of moneys deposited in the fund under sections 26  and 27,
chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017,  and sections 21, 22, 23, 35 and 36 of this 2023 Act,  and may in-
clude fees, revenues or other income deposited into the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(2) Moneys in the fund are  continuously appropriated to the Oregon Business Development De-
partment for purposes described  in sections 26 and 27, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017 , and sections
21, 22, 23, 35 and 36 of this 2023 Act .
SECTION 40.
 Section 10, chapter 906, Oregon Laws 2009, as  amended by section 5, chapter 624,
Oregon Laws 2011, section 14, chapter 812, Oregon  Laws 2015, section 6, chapter 671, Oregon Laws
2019, and section 8, chapter 682, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 10.  (1) The Water Resources Department Water Supply Fund is established separate  and
distinct from the General  Fund. Interest earned on moneys deposited in the Water Resources De-
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 14
partment Water Supply Fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys in the fund  are continuously
appropriated to the Water Resources Department.
(2) The Water Resources Department Water Supply Fund consists of:
(a) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued pursuant to sections 8 and 9, chapter 906, Oregon  Laws
2009, deposited into the Water  Resources Department Water Supply Fund for the following purposes:
(A) $2,500,000 for the purposes of issuing grants to  develop Umatilla Basin critical ground water
storage projects described in section 17, chapter 907, Oregon  Laws 2009, and to provide or pay for
services in connection with those projects.
(B) $217,000 to pay for the operation of loan and grant programs under sections 18 to 27, chapter
907, Oregon Laws 2009.
(C) $283,000 for the  purpose of developing an integrated state water resources strategy to im-
plement the  state water resources policy pursuant to ORS 536.220 and section 45, chapter 907,
Oregon Laws 2009.
(D) $500,000 for purposes of the grant program established by section 1, chapter 13, Oregon
Laws 2008.
(b) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued  pursuant to section 4, chapter 624, Oregon Laws 2011,
in an amount sufficient to provide $1,229,052 in net  proceeds and interest earnings for the depart-
ment to finance grants for feasibility studies for water conservation, reuse and storage projects.
(c) $11 million in net proceeds and interest earnings pursuant  to section 13, chapter 812, Oregon
Laws 2015, to develop and  implement water storage systems and delivery infrastructure, implement
conservation and reuse projects or provide access to new water supplies.
(d) $750,000 in net proceeds and interest earnings pursuant to  section 13, chapter 812, Oregon
Laws 2015, to provide grants for place-based planning.
(e) $1 million in net proceeds and interest earnings pursuant to  section 13, chapter 812, Oregon
Laws 2015, to repair, replace or remediate water wells in the Mosier Creek area.
(f) $14 million in  net proceeds pursuant to section 4, chapter 671, Oregon Laws 2019, as amended
by section  6 [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 682, Oregon Laws 2021,  for remediation of the Big Creek
Dams, including design,  environmental permitting and construction of a seismically sound replace-
ment dam.
(g) $14 million in net proceeds pursuant to section 5, chapter 671, Oregon Laws  2019, as
amended by section  7 [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 682, Oregon Laws 2021,  for rehabilitation of the
Wallowa Lake Dam.
(h) $5 million in net proceeds pursuant to section 26 of this 2023 Act, to replace  the City
of West Linn drinking water pipe over the Willamette River.
[(h)] (i) Any other fees, revenues or income deposited in the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 41.
 Section 6, chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013, as  amended by section 27, chapter 812,
Oregon Laws 2015, section 23, chapter 748,  Oregon Laws 2017, section 36, chapter 671, Oregon Laws
2019, and section 45, chapter 682, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 6.  (1) The Cultural Resources Economic  Fund is established in the State Treasury, separate
and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned on the moneys  in the Cultural Resources Eco-
nomic Fund shall be  credited to the fund. The Cultural Resources Economic Fund consists of moneys
deposited in the fund  under section 5, chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013, section 26, chapter 812,
Oregon Laws 2015, section 22, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017,  [ and] section 44 [ of this 2021 Act ],
chapter 682, Oregon Laws 2021, and section 38 of this 2023 Act,  and may include fees, revenues
or other income deposited in the fund by the Legislative Assembly.
(2) Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to  the Oregon Business Development De-
partment for disbursement for the  purposes set forth in section 5, chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013,
[and] section 26, chapter  812, Oregon Laws 2015, section 22, chapter 748, Oregon Laws 2017, [ and]
section 44 [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 682, Oregon Laws 2021, and section 38 of this 2023 Act .
SECTION 42.  Section 3, chapter 682, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2021,  at the request of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, after the  department consults with the Department of Education, the
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 15
State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds  pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an
amount that produces $17.5 million in net proceeds for  the purposes described in subsection (2) of
this section, plus an additional amount estimated  by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay
bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section  must be transferred to the Depart-
ment of Education for deposit in the Connecting Oregon Schools Fund established in ORS 276A.424
for providing  matching funds for federal moneys received by school districts , education service
districts, public charter schools or a consortium that consists of any combination  of school
districts, education service districts and public charter  schools  for the purpose of providing
broadband access to eligible [ schools] education facilities in this state.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or  restore and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) Assisting  [ school districts ] education facilities  with matching funds promotes expansion of
access to high speed broadband for public education; and
(b) Providing financial assistance to [ school districts ] education facilities  for building con-
nections to broadband infrastructure will enhance community efforts to promote economic growth.
SECTION 43.
(1) Prior to requesting the issuance of lottery bonds pursuant to this 2023
Act, the Oregon Department of Administrative Services shall  review each authorized use of
lottery bond proceeds and determine whether the recipient is ready  to expend the proceeds
for the authorized use.
(2) If the department  determines that a recipient is not ready to expend the proceeds for
an authorized use, the State Treasurer may not issue lottery bonds under this 2023  Act for
the authorized use.
SECTION 44. (1) For the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, at the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services, after the department consults with  the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery  bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $20 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of  lottery bonds issued under this section must be transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department  for deposit in the Coos Bay Channel Fund estab-
lished by section 15,  chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, for distribution to the Oregon Interna-
tional Port of Coos Bay to deepen and widen the Coos Bay Federal Navigation Channel.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
port facilities and  related infrastructure are an integral part of the commercial and indus-
trial infrastructure of this state, and promote economic development.
SECTION 45. (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, at  the request of the Oregon
Department of Administrative  Services, after the department consults with the Oregon
Business Development Department, the State Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds
pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 in an amount that  produces $20 million in net proceeds
for the purposes described in subsection (2) of  this section, plus an additional amount esti-
mated by the State Treasurer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) Net proceeds of lottery bonds issued under this section must be  transferred to the
Oregon Business Development Department for deposit in the Coos Bay  Channel Fund estab-
lished by section 15, chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, for distribution to  the Oregon Interna-
tional Port of Coos Bay to deepen and widen the Coos Bay Federal Navigation Channel.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond proceeds will  create jobs,
further economic development, finance public education  or restore and protect parks,
beaches, watersheds and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the finding  that
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 16
port facilities and related infrastructure are an integral part of the commercial  and indus-
trial infrastructure of this state, and promote economic development.
SECTION 46.  Section 15, chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, is amended to read:
Sec. 15.  (1) The Coos Bay Channel Fund is established separate and distinct from  the General
Fund. Interest earned by the Coos Bay  Channel Fund shall be credited to the fund. The moneys in
the Coos Bay Channel  Fund are continuously appropriated to the [ Economic and Community ]
Oregon Business  Development Department  for the purpose described in subsection (2) of this sec-
tion. The fund shall consist of moneys transferred to the fund under section 13 [ of this  2007 Act ],
chapter 746, Oregon Laws 2007, and sections 44 and 45 of  this 2023 Act  and interest earnings
on moneys in the fund.
(2) Moneys in the fund are available to the department for distribution to  the primary sponsor
to pay the nonfederal cost share, or the nonprivate cost share, of expenses of the project up to  the
[amount] amounts  specified in section 13 [ of this 2007 Act ], chapter 746,  Oregon Laws 2007, and
sections 44 and 45 of this 2023 Act  and to pay bond-related costs.
SECTION 47. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by House June 25, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 25, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5030 (HB 5030-A) Page 17